Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-137
University of Nebraska State Museum License Plate Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The University of Nebraska State Museum License Plate Cash Fund is created and shall be administered by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska. The fund shall include money credited pursuant to section 60-3,163.02, gifts, grants, bequests, private contributions, and money from any public or private source. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(2) Money in the fund shall be used for promoting understanding, appreciation, and stewardship of science and natural history through research, public education, and outreach at museums managed by the University of Nebraska.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 77.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.